Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 43 Commission on Men’s Health

31-43-1 through 31-43-13.
[Reserved]

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2019, p. 919, § 10-1/HB 553, effective July 1, 2019.

Editor’s notes.

This chapter consisted of Code Sections

31-43-1

through

31-43-1

3, relating to Commission on Men’s Health, and was based on Code 1981, §§ 31-43-1 through 31-43-13, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 126, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 31; Ga. L. 2005, p. 48, § 3/HB 309; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 919, § 10-2/HB 553, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Any assets of the Commission on Men’s Health existing as of June 30, 2019, shall devolve by operation of law and without further action to the State of Georgia on July 1, 2019. Any liabilities and obligations of the Commission on Men’s Health existing as of June 30, 2019, shall be transferred to and assumed by the State of Georgia, by such instruments as may be required to maintain the same.”

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2019, the amendment of Code Section 31-43-12 by Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-14/HB 186, was treated as impliedly repealed and superseded by Ga. L. 2019, p. 919, § 10-1/HB 553, due to irreconcilable conflict.